Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.595

Dismissal of municipal employees during World War II—Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, "municipality" means a city, town, county, special purpose district, municipal corporation, quasi-municipal corporation, or political subdivision of the state of Washington. For the purposes of this chapter, a "municipal employee" means an employee of a municipality.

[ 1986 c 225 s 5.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—1986 c 225: See notes following RCW 41.04.580.